Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-18] Reports to be submitted by the
department and authorized agencies. (a) Unless otherwise ordered by the
court, the department or other authorized agencies shall file written reports
with the court:

(1) Concurrent with the filing of a petition invoking
the jurisdiction of the court under this chapter; and

(2) No less than fifteen days before a scheduled
return hearing, periodic review hearing, permanency hearing, or termination of
parental rights hearing; provided that additional information may be submitted
to the court up to the date of the hearing; provided that the department or
other authorized agencies make a good cause showing that such additional
information was not available to the department or other authorized agency
before the fifteen day deadline.

(b) The reports shall include:

(1) An assessment of each safe family home factor and
the family's progress with recommended or court-ordered services;

(2) A recommended service plan or permanent plan that
references the pertinent safe family home factors; and

(3) A recommendation documenting the basis for any
other orders, including protective orders.

(c) The department or other authorized
agencies shall submit to the court each report, in its entirety, pertaining to
the child or the child's family that has been prepared by a child protective
services multidisciplinary team or consultant.

(d) A written report submitted pursuant to
this section shall be admissible and relied upon to the extent of its probative
value in any proceeding under this chapter, subject to the right of any party
to examine or cross-examine the preparer of the report. [L 2010, c 135, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next